nl: Beoogde zitpositie: Linksvoor; Rechtsvoor; Middenachter; Linksachter; Rechtsachter; Universeel; Overig
ja: 想定される着座位置: フロント左; フロント右; リア中央; リア左; リア右; ユニバーサル; その他
es: Posición de asiento prevista: Delantero izquierdo; Delantero derecho; Trasero central; Trasero izquierdo; Trasero derecho; Universal; Otra
hu: Tervezett üléspozíció: Bal első; Jobb első; Hátsó középső; Bal hátsó; Jobb hátsó; Univerzális; Egyéb
bg-BG: Предназначена позиция за сядане: Предно ляво; Предно дясно; Задно средно; Задно ляво; Задно дясно; Универсално; Други
fi: Tarkoitettu istuma-asento: Etu vasen; Etu oikea; Taka keskellä; Taka vasen; Taka oikea; Yleiskäyttöinen; Muu
lt-LT: Numatyta sėdėjimo vieta: Priekinė kairė; Priekinė dešinė; Galinė vidurinė; Galinė kairė; Galinė dešinė; Universali; Kita
hr-HR: Predviđeni položaj sjedenja: Sprijeda lijevo; Sprijeda desno; Straga u sredini; Straga lijevo; Straga desno; Univerzalno; Ostalo
el: Προβλεπόμενη θέση καθίσματος: Εμπρός αριστερά; Εμπρός δεξιά; Πίσω κέντρο; Πίσω αριστερά; Πίσω δεξιά; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
pt-BR: Posição de assento pretendida: Dianteira esquerda; Dianteira direita; Traseira central; Traseira esquerda; Traseira direita; Universal; Outra
it: Posizione di seduta prevista: Anteriore sinistro; Anteriore destro; Posteriore centrale; Posteriore sinistro; Posteriore destro; Universale; Altro
zh-TW: 適用座椅位置: 左前; 右前; 後排中央; 左後; 右後; 通用; 其他
vi: Vị trí ngồi dự định: Trước bên trái; Trước bên phải; Sau ở giữa; Sau bên trái; Sau bên phải; Toàn cầu; Khác
da: Tiltænkt siddeposition: Foran til venstre; Foran til højre; Bagi i midten; Bagi til venstre; Bagi til højre; Universal; Andet
pl: Przewidziana pozycja siedząca: Przód, lewa; Przód, prawa; Tył, środek; Tył, lewa; Tył, prawa; Uniwersalne; Inne
zh-CN: 建议坐姿: 左前; 右前; 后中; 左后; 右后; 通用; 其他
fr: Position d’assise prévue: Avant gauche; Avant droit; Arrière centre; Arrière gauche; Arrière droit; Universel; Autre
pt-PT: Posição de assento pretendida: Frente esquerda; Frente direita; Traseira centro; Traseira esquerda; Traseira direita; Universal; Outro
de: Vorgesehene Sitzposition: Vorne links; Vorne rechts; Hinten Mitte; Hinten links; Hinten rechts; Universal; Sonstige
sk-SK: Zamýšľaná poloha sedenia: Vpredu vľavo; Vpredu vpravo; Vzadu v strede; Vzadu vľavo; Vzadu vpravo; Univerzálne; Iné
ru: Предназначенное посадочное место: Спереди слева; Спереди справа; Сзади по центру; Сзади слева; Сзади справа; Универсальное; Другое
nb: Tiltenkt sittestilling: Foran venstre; Foran høyre; Bak i midten; Bak venstre; Bak høyre; Universell; Annet
ko: 좌석 위치 용도: 전면 좌측; 전면 우측; 후면 중앙; 후면 좌측; 후면 우측; 범용; 기타
th: ตำแหน่งที่นั่งที่ตั้งใจไว้: หน้าซ้าย; หน้าขวา; หลังกลาง; หลังซ้าย; หลังขวา; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
tr: Amaçlanan oturma pozisyonu: Ön sol; Ön sağ; Arka orta; Arka sol; Arka sağ; Evrensel; Diğer
sv: Avsedd sittposition: Fram vänster; Fram höger; Bak mitten; Bak vänster; Bak höger; Universell; Annat
ro-RO: Poziția de ședere dorită: Față stânga; Față dreapta; Spate centru; Spate stânga; Spate dreapta; Universal; Altele
cs: Zamýšlená poloha sezení: Přední levé; Přední pravé; Zadní střední; Zadní levé; Zadní pravé; Univerzální; Jiné
en: Intended seating position: Front left; Front right; Rear center; Rear left; Rear right; Universal; Other
sl-SI: Predvideni položaj sedeža: Spredaj levo; Spredaj desno; Zadaj sredina; Zadaj levo; Zadaj desno; Univerzalno; Drugo